Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 4. Employee Benefits
§ 27-14-405.
Permanent partial disability; benefits; schedule; permanent disfigurement; disputed ratings.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 3.

Renumbered as (k) by Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 3.

Renumbered as (m) by Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 2.

An injured employee suffering an ascertainable loss may apply for a permanent partial impairment award as provided in this section.

An injured employee’s impairment shall be rated by a licensed physician using the most recent edition of the American Medical Association’s guide to the evaluation of permanent impairment. The award shall be paid as provided by W.S.

27-14-403

for the number of months determined by multiplying the percentage of impairment by sixty (60) months.

An injured employee awarded permanent partial impairment benefits may apply for a permanent disability award subject to the following terms and conditions:

The injured employee is because of the injury, unable to return to employment at a wage that is at least ninety-five percent (95%) of the monthly gross earnings the employee was earning at the time of injury;

An application for permanent partial disability is filed not before three (3) months after the date of ascertainable loss or three (3) months before the last scheduled impairment payment, whichever occurs later, but in no event later than one (1) year following the later date; and

The employee has actively sought suitable work, considering the employee’s health, education, training and experience.

The disability award under subsection (h) of this section shall be payable monthly in the amount provided by W.S.

27-14-403

for the number of months determined by adding the number of months computed under this subsection as follows:

Fourteen (14) months, multiplied by a fraction in which the numerator is sixty-five (65) minus the employee’s age at the date of injury and the denominator is forty-five (45);

Eight and one-half (8 1/2) months, multiplied by a fraction in which the numerator is four (4) minus the employee’s completed years of education beyond the twelfth grade, not to exceed four (4) years, and the denominator is four (4);

Six (6) months, multiplied by a fraction in which the numerator is four (4) minus the number of different occupations in which the employee has worked at least eighteen (18) months in the eight (8) year period preceding the injury but not to exceed four (4), and the denominator is four (4);

Up to two (2) months if the employee at the time of injury was engaged in a formal education or training program for an occupation which was reasonably expected to pay more than the employee’s employment at the time of injury and the employee, because of the permanent injury, will be unable to enter into the new occupation;

One (1) month if the employee is forty-five (45) to forty-nine (49) years of age at the time of injury, two (2) months if the employee is fifty (50) to fifty-four (54) years of age at the time of injury, and three (3) months if the employee is fifty-five (55) years of age or older at the time of injury.

An employee incurring permanent disfigurement due to an injury to the face or head which affects his earning capacity or ability to secure gainful employment shall receive in proportion to the extent of the disfigurement, an additional physical impairment award not to exceed six (6) months of compensation payable monthly as provided by W.S. 27-14-403(c). Any previous disfigurement to the face or head of the employee shall be considered when authorizing the award.

If the percentage of physical impairment is disputed, the division shall obtain a second opinion and if the ratings conflict, shall determine the physical impairment award upon consideration of the initial and second opinion. Any objection to a final determination pursuant to this subsection shall be referred to the medical commission for hearing by a medical hearing panel acting as hearing examiner pursuant to W.S.

27-14-616

.

This section specifies the length of time amounts computed pursuant to W.S. 27-14-403(c) are to be awarded and except for amounts awarded under W.S.

27-14-408

, shall not be construed to allow awards in excess of the amounts computed pursuant to W.S. 27-14-403(c).

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1987, ch. 94, § 1; 1993, ch. 229, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, §§ 2, 3; 2000, ch. 98, § 1; 2009, ch. 156, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (g), substituted “sixty (60) months” for “forty-four (44) months.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Maximum medical improvement.—

Medical Commission did not err by using the definition of maximum medical improvement (MMI) in the AMA Guides to Evaluation of Permanent Impairment because the AMA Guides definition of MMI was consistent with Wyoming law. Morris v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 119, 403 P.3d 980,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2017).

Claimant reached maximum medical improvement (MMI) and no longer qualified for temporary total disability benefits because substantial evidence in the testimony of doctors supported the decision that the claimant had reached MMI—despite the plan by the claimant’s to use a spinal cord stimulator to reduce the claimant’s pain and improve the claimant’s quality of living following a work related back injury. Coggins v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., Workers' Comp. Div., 2018 WY 77, 421 P.3d 555,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2018).

Legislative treatment of cumulative effect of injuries. —

Examination of compensation schedule for permanent partial disability in conjunction with definition of permanent total disability makes it clear that while legislature fixed specific awards for loss of single members of body, cumulative effect of injuries has not been overlooked. Sakamoto v. Kemmerer Coal Co., 36 Wyo. 325, 255 P. 356,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1927).

A worker's compensation case involving a disputed impairment rating

which was initially referred to the Office of Administrative Hearings under W.S. §

27-14-616

shall be transferred to the medical commission pursuant to subsection (m) of this section. Lyles v. State ex rel. Division of Workers' Compensation (In re Lyles), 957 P.2d 843,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1998).

Loss of earning capacity primary consideration in disability compensation. —

The concept of disability compensation rests on the premise that the primary consideration is not medical impairment as such, but rather loss of earning capacity related to that impairment. Factors other than medical evidence, such as loss of income in appropriate cases, may be considered in determining the amount of the award. McCarty v. Bear Creek Uranium Co., 694 P.2d 93,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 429

(Wyo. 1985).

Loss of earnings benefits was premised on claimant's ability to work at a reduced level of functioning, and evidence did not support award where claimant's inability to join the work force was due to his incarceration. Apodaca v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 977 P.2d 56,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1999).

Injured employee was not entitled to permanent partial disability benefits, where he was given full medical release to return to work as a mechanic and was physically capable of performing his work, but instead sought and accepted lower paying parts department position. Sidwell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 977 P.2d 60,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1999).

Evidence supported finding that injured employee voluntarily took a lower paying position, and thus hearing examiner was not required to determine whether employee's pre-injury and post-injury wages were comparable. Sidwell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 977 P.2d 60,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1999).

Hearing examiner did not err by considering the employee's actual post-injury employment even though it commenced after she applied for and was denied permanent partial disability (PPD) benefits and was located in Nebraska because the focus of this section, which sets out the requirements for PPD benefits, was on an injured employee's actual ability to earn, and if the court were to accept the employee's argument that her employment commencing after the filing of an application for PPD benefits could not be considered, employees would have a disincentive to return to work following an injury. Such an interpretation would clearly be inconsistent with this section, which required employees to show they had actively sought suitable work in order to qualify for PPD benefits.
Chavez v. Mem'l Hosp. of Sweetwater County, 2006 WY 82, 138 P.3d 185,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2006).

Employee should have been awarded permanent partial disability benefits because the employee could not find employment in Wyoming at a wage that was at least 95 percent of his pre-injury wage. One proposed job did not defeat the employee's overwhelming evidence that he was entitled to benefits.
Block v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2009 WY 34, 202 P.3d 1064,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2009).

Workers'
compensation claimant was unable to return to work at a job paying at least 95% of what he was earning prior to his work injury as required by this section for permanent partial disability benefits because the claimant asserted that he was unable to drive based on the limited range of motion in his neck and a physical therapist confirmed that the claimant's coordination and timing were slow.
Mahaffey v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2011 WY 45, 249 P.3d 234,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Mar. 11, 2011).

Comparison of pre-injury wage and post-injury wage. —

The court considered loss of earning capacity and whether a comparison of the pre-injury wage to the post-injury wage offered was compensable under the applicable statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-405(h). The worker's post-injury wage was compensable, and the order awarding benefits was affirmed. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Savicki, 2004 WY 71, 92 P.3d 294,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2004).

Permanent partial disability benefits were properly awarded to claimant because substantial evidence showed that claimant was unable to return to employment at a wage that was at least 95 percent of his pre-injury wage pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-405(h)(i), given his physical impairment and lifting restrictions.
State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. v. Baldwin (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Baldwin), 2008 WY 125, 196 P.3d 1087,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2008).

Claim for permanent partial disability benefits was properly denied because the claimant could not show that he was unable to return to work at a wage at least 95 percent of his pre-injury wage, as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-405(h)(i); he earned more per month over the past seven years prior to his application for benefits than he earned prior to his 2001 injury. Decker v. State ex rel. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2013 WY 75, 303 P.3d 1134,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2013).

Double recovery prohibited. —

A claimant cannot properly be compensated for the partial loss of his entire arm and also be compensated for the individual injuries to the same member. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div. v. Colvin, 681 P.2d 269,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1984).

The language in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-405

, as it was in effect in 1990 and 2000, was clear and unambiguous, and the subtraction language in the statute in effect in 1990 was superfluous, because the law did not allow one to receive double compensation for the same injury. Taylor v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2003 WY 83, 72 P.3d 799,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2003).

Although Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-406(a) is ambiguous as to whether all previous impairment awards under this section must be deducted from a permanent total disability award, a reduction was proper where the claimant did not contend that any aspect of his impairment was unrelated to his permanent total disability.
State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2011 WY 57, 248 P.3d 1155,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2011).

Permanent total disability. —

A workers' compensation claimant's injury, for purposes of his new claim for permanent total disability and extended benefits, was deemed to have occurred when he was found to be permanently disabled. Rodgers v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 939 P.2d 246,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1997), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. July 8, 1997).

Permanent partial disability is not affected by fact worker has continued to work

and has received increases in his salaries. In re Van Buskirk, 741 P.2d 120,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1987).

Return to work at lesser wage. —

Where wage at which injured employee could return to work was 89 percent of his pre-injury wage, employee could not be deemed able to return to employment at a comparable or higher wage, and thus hearing examiner erred in denying employee's claim for permanent partial disability benefits. Adams v. State, ex rel. Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 975 P.2d 17,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 22

.

Setting of “comparable wage” at 80% held to be without effect. —

In accordance with the court's statutory interpretation of what constitutes a “comparable wage” in Adams v. State, ex rel. Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 975 P.2d 17,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 22

, and because the division lacks the power to legislate or to amend the Act, the division's rule setting 80 percent as a threshold of wage comparability was an improper attempt to amend § 27-14-405(h)(i) and was, therefore, without effect. Cochran v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 993 P.2d 320,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 1999).

Additional compensation awarded for separate injury. —

A prior award for permanent partial disability does not bar an employee from additional compensation premised upon a separate and distinct injury. In re Van Buskirk, 741 P.2d 120,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1987).

Totally disabled employee entitled to additional benefits. —

An employee who received a lump sum permanent partial disability award, and later became temporarily and totally disabled after rod removal surgery, sustained an increase of incapacity and was therefore entitled to additional benefits, regardless of whether his permanent partial disability had increased. Parnell v. State, 735 P.2d 1367,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 428

(Wyo. 1987).

But employee not totally disabled is not so entitled. —

Where injured worker who had received partial disability awards for 74.5% whole body impairment for slip-and-fall injury at work subsequently applied for an additional 25.5% disability award after back surgery, the hearing officer correctly refused the application since the evidence showed the worker was not totally disabled and was capable of finding work after the surgery. Whiteman v. Workers' Safety and Compensation Div., 987 P.2d 670,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1999).

Determination of permanent effect of original disability. —

A workers' compensation claimant's first application for permanent benefits, after the claimant had received total temporary benefits, was a new claim for benefits that did not entail an increase or decrease in disability, but a determination as to the permanent effect of the original disability. Tenorio v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 234,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1997), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 4, 1997).

Weight of evidence did not support determination of permanent partial disability,

where the attending physician stated that claimant had suffered no loss of function of body or limb in terms of physical impairment, and the claimant alleged pain which could not be substantiated. Fischer v. State, 734 P.2d 558,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 414

(Wyo. 1987).

Date of compensable injury not equated with determination of partial disability. —

Although under certain circumstances the date of a compensable injury and a determination of partial disability could be simultaneous, it is error to equate compensable injury with determination of partial disability. Claim of Evans, 417 P.2d 17,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1966).

Apportionment of pre-existing condition and work-related injury not authorized under Wyoming law. —

Wyoming Medical Commission properly determined that a workers'
compensation claimant's injury was a material aggravation of a preexisting condition and rated his impairment at 23 percent; the Commission did not apportion the rating between the claimant's pre-existing condition and the work-related injury, concluding that apportionment was not authorized under Wyoming law. Also, the Commission specifically found that claimant's back condition and impairment were aggravated by the work injury, and that there was no evidence that the claimant was receiving a double recovery because he had never received an impairment rating before the current injury; thus, for purposes of awarding permanent partial impairment benefits, the trial court was correct in not apportioning the claimant's pre-existing condition and his work-related injury.
State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Faulkner, 2007 WY 31, 152 P.3d 394,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2007).

Burden of proof. —

To receive permanent partial disability benefits, a claimant must show not only that he has suffered a permanent impairment which would not substantially change in the future, but also the extent to which the permanent impairment resulted from the compensable injury. Tenorio v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 234,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1997), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 4, 1997).

Claimant failed to meet her burden of proof that she was unable to return to employment at a comparable or higher wage than she was earning at time of her injury, where her testimony was anecdotal, self-serving, unsupported by documentary evidence, and demonstrated that she was able to work periodically, and without any substantial showing that there was good reason that she was not able to work more than periodically. Lunde v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 6 P.3d 1256,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2000).

Hearing examiner did not err by considering the employee's actual post-injury employment even though it commenced after she applied for and was denied permanent partial disability (PPD) benefits and was located in Nebraska because the focus of this section, which set out the requirements for PPD benefits, was on an injured employee's actual ability to earn. There was no dispute regarding the employee's actual post-injury employment; therefore she did not meet the statutory requirements for PPD benefits under this section and the Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division was entitled to summary judgment pursuant to Wyo. R. Civ. P. 56, as a matter of law.
Chavez v. Mem'l Hosp. of Sweetwater County, 2006 WY 82, 138 P.3d 185,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2006).

Standard of proof. —

This section requires a claimant to show by a preponderance of the evidence that his injury renders him incapable of returning to work at a higher or comparable wage. Wright v. State ex rel. Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 978 P.2d 1162,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1999).

When determining compensation, court considers how claimant impaired in performing pre-injury work. —

This section was designed to allow the trial court to consider the work for which a claimant was suited before the injury and how he was impaired in performing this work after the injury when determining the compensation a claimant should receive. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div. v. Colvin, 681 P.2d 269,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1984).

Court considers ability to perform work for which claimant is suited. —

The trial court is not limited to considering only the claimant's decreased ability to perform the work he held before the injury. Rather, it is the claimant's ability to continue to perform work for which he is reasonably suited which is one factor to be considered. Worker's Compensation Claim of Cannon v. FMC Corp., 718 P.2d 879,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1986).

An injured employee's ability to perform work for which that person is reasonably suited is just one of the factors to be addressed in deciding how the injury affected earning capacity. At least in part, that focus must rest upon whether the injury will prevent or hinder the injured worker from continuing in, or returning to, an occupation for which that person has the proper training and experience. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Borodine, 784 P.2d 228,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1989).

And is not bound by medical testimony. —

In making the factual determination of the extent of the claimant's injury, the trial court is not bound by medical testimony; nonmedical witnesses and other evidence may be relied on. Worker's Compensation Claim of Cannon v. FMC Corp., 718 P.2d 879,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1986).

Vocational evaluations. —

Vocational evaluations should be based on available jobs in Wyoming, and evaluation of such jobs must be conducted with some basis in reality which gives recognition to the worker's disability. Lunde v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 6 P.3d 1256,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2000).

It was not error to rely on the claimant's actual employment in Texas instead of a theoretical vocation evaluation because the report did not refer to a claimant's lifting restrictions and did not use the correct wage as the basis for its conclusions. Also, the claimant was unable to perform or not qualified for several jobs in Wyoming.
In re Worker's Compensation Claim v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Workers'
Safety & Compensation Div., 2006 WY 114, 142 P.3d 686,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(2006).

Where hearing officer's decision denying appellant's claim for permanent partial disability benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-405(h)(i) was based on the vocational evaluator's erroneous assessment of his wages at the time of the injury, the supreme court of Wyoming reversed the district court's decision affirming the denial of benefits as unsupported by substantial evidence under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-3-114(c).
Yother v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2007 WY 192, 173 P.3d 356,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Dec. 11, 2007).

Actively seeking suitable employment. —

The claimant was improperly denied permanent partial disability benefits, notwithstanding the contention by the employer that he had not actively sought suitable employment, where a letter written by the claimant's physician clearly relayed his medical opinion that any level of regular work activity would make the claimant's already extraordinarily limited physical capacity and condition worse since such opinion supported the inference that the claimant could not return to work at all, at least for a comparable or higher wage. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2001 WY 48, 23 P.3d 32,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2001).

There was substantial evidence to support the hearing examiner's conclusion that claimant had not engaged in any kind of sustained effort to apply or train for work and that there was work at a comparable or higher wage available for claimant despite a language barrier and lifting restrictions. Hermosillo v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 175, 58 P.3d 924,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 2002).

Substantial evidence supported the office of administrative hearings' decision that the employee had not actively sought suitable employment as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-405

. While the employee contacted six employers in October 2000, the employee only submitted four actual employment applications; the employee contacted two employers in 2001, but submitted no employment applications; just days before submitting an application for permanent partial disability, the employee contacted six other employers, yet did not submit a single employment application; and the employee had not pursued potential alternative occupation positions that were available. Ludwig v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Ludwig), 2004 WY 34, 86 P.3d 875,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2004).

Although in its decision the office of administrative hearings (OAH) also concluded that the evidence supported the finding that the employee was unable to work because of a degenerative back condition, rather than a specific work-related injury, the Wyoming Supreme Court was satisfied that the determinative issue before the OAH was whether the employee actively sought suitable employment as required by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-405(h). The employee was given adequate notice of that determinative issue, fully litigated that issue, there was no due process violation, and the OAHs decision was conclusive. Ludwig v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Ludwig), 2004 WY 34, 86 P.3d 875,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2004).

Permanent partial disability benefits were properly awarded to a claimant because substantial evidence supported hearing examiner's determination that claimant sought suitable work pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-405(h)(iii) where claimant had registered with the Wyoming Job Network and could describe a number of potential employers whom he had contacted.
State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. v. Baldwin (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Baldwin), 2008 WY 125, 196 P.3d 1087,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2008).

Evidence of disability. —

Evidence — Manual for Orthopedic Surgeons in Evaluating Permanent Physical Impairment — supported finding of a permanent partial disability of 20% for a back injury, the only other evidence being the testimony of the employee himself with respect to limitations of function, which testimony was consistent with his medical diagnosis and treatment and not in conflict with the medical evaluation. Buckley v. Bell, 703 P.2d 1089,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1985).

Employee eligible where he had an ascertainable loss. —

Employee had an ascertainable loss and qualified for benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-405

where he had a poor prognosis and could not safely return to a physically demanding position, and he had reached maximum medical improvement unless he was willing to consider fusion surgery, but the employee had to submit written application to qualify. Phillips v. TIC-The Industrial Co. of Wyoming, Inc. (In re Phillips), 2005 WY 40, 109 P.3d 520,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2005).

Disputed impairment rating. —

Pursuant to subsection (e) and where the percentage of physical impairment was disputed, plaintiff was entitled to a second opinion with respect to his impairment rating. Routh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 952 P.2d 1108,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. Feb. 17, 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 814, 119 S. Ct. 49, 142 L. Ed. 2d 38, 1998 U.S. LEXIS 4815 (U.S. 1998).

Workers' compensation division acted in accordance with law when it employed a case review physician to review claimant's disputed impairment ratings, and then relied on physician's review in denying benefits. Pohl v. Bailey Co., 980 P.2d 816,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1999).

In a workers' compensation case, rejection of the employee's treating physician's impairment rating was proper because independent medical evaluators concluded that the employee's impairment did not involve an alteration of motion segment integrity, as determined by the treating physician, and that a 2% whole person impairment rating was consistent with the employee's medical history. Willey v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Willey), 2012 WY 144, 288 P.3d 418,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2012).

Workers' compensation claimant was not entitled to a permanent partial impairment rating greater than 9% whole body because his level of impairment was properly classified as Class 1 under the motion segment lesions grid; a rating made by a physician's assistant did not include an analysis of the dermatomal distribution, and a finding of loss of reflexes was contradicted by other medical records. A report specifically referred to the grade 4 radiculopathy factors when a doctor determined that the impairment fell within Class 1, and the claimant did not offer any medical evidence to show that the doctor's interpretation of the American Medical Association Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment was incorrect. Hurt v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Hurt), 2015 WY 106, 355 P.3d 375,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2015).

Because a
worker's 2010 permanent partial impairment (PPI) evaluation using
the 6th edition of the American Medical Association (AMA) Guides
resulted
in a rating that was less than his 2005 rating using the
5th edition
(7 percent whole body PPI in 2010, rather than 21 percent
whole body
in 2005), it was proper to deny a PPI award beyond the
21 percent
already paid. It was proper to compare ratings calculated
under different
editions of the American Medical Association (AMA)
Guides. Green v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2013 WY 81, 304 P.3d 941,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence of loss of income. —

The district court properly refused to admit evidence of claimant's prior earnings on the issue of loss of income, where the primary factor in his failure to obtain work was the depressed economy in his county and the surrounding environs. Arcoren v. Westburne Drilling, 730 P.2d 128,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 652

(Wyo. 1986).

A single check stub from a past pay check would be insufficient to properly establish loss of income. Arcoren v. Westburne Drilling, 730 P.2d 128,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 652

(Wyo. 1986).

Award of permanent partial disability was proper because a claimant showed a loss of earnings under this section; a back injury rendered the claimant ineligible to return to employment at a paint store, so the fact that the store had closed after the injury was not the cause of loss of earnings and neither was the lack of overtime at a new job.
In re Bonsell v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2006 WY 114, 142 P.3d 686,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2006).

Subjective pain. —

Subjective pain may support an impairment rating under the American Medical Association (AMA) Guides when that pain reduces the claimant's range of motion. Pacific Power & Light v. Heermann, 872 P.2d 1171,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1994).

Judicial discretion as to manner of payment. —

The discretion of trial judge as to the manner of payment of compensation for permanent partial disabilities should not be disturbed, on appeal, except for abuse of that discretion. McKinney v. Manning & Martin, 55 Wyo. 268, 99 P.2d 922,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1940).

Lump sum payments not the rule. —

Lump sum payments of compensation for permanent partial disabilities are the exception and not the rule, conformable with view that generally disabled workman and his dependents will be best served with payments as wages are paid; hence, any lump sum payment is largely within discretion of the judge, who should consider all surrounding needs, present and possible. McKinney v. Manning & Martin, 55 Wyo. 268, 99 P.2d 922,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1940).

Veteran's administration rating not relevant. —

Fact that federal rating board of the veteran's administration rated employee as permanently partially disabled to the extent of 25% should not have any weight with the court, being the opinion of an unrelated tribunal involving quite different matters from those at bar. Baldwin v. Scullion, 50 Wyo. 508, 62 P.2d 531,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1936).

Allowance of proportionate amount for permanent total disability. —

District court was authorized to allow miner sustaining permanent partial disability through injuries to back and spine, which disability was not listed in schedule, proportionate amount of statutory sum for permanent total disability. In re Koprowski, 48 Wyo. 334, 46 P.2d 61,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1935).

Calculation of additional benefits. —

Office of Administrative Hearings' method of calculating a claimant's additional benefits was correct, where the claimant had had a second compensable injury making his Permanent Partial Impairment rating an additional eight percent over his original assessment. Therefore, the calculation, based on the version of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-405(g) in effect in 2000, was eight percent times 44 months times the wage rate in effect in the quarter preceding July 2000. Taylor v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2003 WY 83, 72 P.3d 799,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

Gilstrap v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 875 P.2d 1272,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1994); Ireland v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Comp. Div., 998 P.2d 398,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2000); Howe v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 109, 401 P.3d 939,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2017).

Quoted

in

Allen v. Natrona County Sch. Dist. No. One, 811 P.2d 1,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1991); Cordova v. Holly Sugar Corp., 882 P.2d 880,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1994); Erdman v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 5 P.3d 64,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2000); Serda v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 38, 42 P.3d 466,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Sims v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 872 P.2d 555,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Thompson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 768 P.2d 600,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1989); Hemme v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 914 P.2d 824,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1996); Hernandez v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. 1 (In re Hernandez), 8 P.3d 318,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2000); Nagle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Nagle), 2008 WY 99, 190 P.3d 159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Aug. 19, 2008); Lane-walter v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2011 WY 52, 250 P.3d 513,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Mar. 24, 2011); Picozzi v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2013 WY 86, 304 P.3d 977,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Jul 16, 2013); Kebschull v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2017 WY 94, 399 P.3d 1249,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workers' compensation: Recovery for carpal tunnel syndrome, 14 ALR5th 1.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law §§ 81.01D, 84.01D (Matthew Bender).